Utah statutes.
75-7-202.   Effect of administration in this state -- Consent to
jurisdiction.
(1)  The trustee submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this
state regarding any matter involving the trust if  the trustee acts as trustee
of a trust administered in this state.
(2)  To the extent of the beneficial interests in a trust administered in this
state, the beneficiaries of the trust are subject to the jurisdiction of the
courts of this state regarding any matter involving the trust.  By accepting a
distribution from such a trust, the recipient submits personally to the
jurisdiction of the courts of this state regarding any matter involving the
trust.
(3)  By accepting the delegation of a trust function from the trustee of a
trust administered in this state, the agent submits to the jurisdiction of the
courts of this state regarding any matter involving the trust.
(4)  Unless otherwise designated in the trust instrument, a trust is
administered in this state if it meets the requirements of Subsection
75-7-107(4).
